Missouri, session 2026, SB1541.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 337.035, 337.330, 337.525, 337.630,
and 337.730, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 337.035, 337.330,
337.525, 337.630, and 337.730, to read as follows:
337.035. 1. The committee may refuse to issue any
certificate of registration or authority, permit or license
required pursuant to this chapter for one or any combination
of causes stated in subsection 2 of this section. The
committee shall notify the applicant in writing of the
reasons for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of
the applicant's right to file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission as provided by
chapter 621 against any holder of any certificate of
registration or authority, permit or license required by
this chapter or any person who has failed to renew or has
surrendered the person's certificate of registration or
authority, permit or license for any one or any combination
of the following causes:

SB 1541 2
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in
chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage to an extent that such
use impairs a person's ability to perform the work of any
profession licensed or regulated by this chapter;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found
guilty, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, in a
criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the
United States, or of any country, for any offense directly
related to the duties and responsibilities of the
occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of
whether or not sentence is imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or
bribery in securing any certificate of registration or
authority, permit or license issued pursuant to this chapter
or in obtaining permission to take any examination given or
required pursuant to this chapter;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud,
misrepresentation or dishonesty in the performance of the
functions or duties of any profession licensed or regulated
by this chapter;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person
to violate, any provision of this chapter, or of any lawful
rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a certificate
of registration or authority, permit or license or allowing
any person to use his or her certificate of registration or
authority, permit, license or diploma from any school;
(8) Disciplinary action against the holder of a
license or other right to practice any profession regulated

SB 1541 3
by this chapter granted by another state, territory, federal
agency or country upon grounds for which revocation or
suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) A person is finally adjudged insane or
incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or
offer to practice any profession licensed or regulated by
this chapter who is not registered and currently eligible to
practice as provided this chapter;
(11) Issuance of a certificate of registration or
authority, permit or license based upon a material mistake
of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid certificate or license
if so required by this chapter or any rule promulgated
pursuant to this chapter;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is
false, misleading or deceptive to the general public or
persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is
primarily directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in
"Ethical Rules of Conduct" as adopted by the committee and
filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For
purposes of this subdivision, the term "conversion therapy"
means any practices or treatments that seek to change an
individual's sexual orientation or gender identity,
including efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions
or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or
feelings toward individuals of the same gender. The term
"conversion therapy" shall not include counseling that
provides assistance to a person undergoing gender transition

SB 1541 4
or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and
understanding of a person or facilitates a person's coping,
social support, and identity exploration and development,
including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to
prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual
practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings
shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of
this section, for disciplinary action are met, the committee
may, singly or in combination, censure or place the person
named in the complaint on probation on such terms and
conditions as the department deems appropriate for a period
not to exceed five years, or may suspend, for a period not
to exceed three years, or revoke the license, certificate,
or permit.
4. An interested third party may file a complaint or
100 appear or present evidence relative to such complaint or
101 another complaint filed pursuant to this section. For
102 purposes of this section, an interested third party includes
103 a parent or guardian of a person who received treatment by a
104 psychologist or any person who is related within the second
105 degree of consanguinity or affinity and who is financially
106 responsible for the payment of such treatment.
337.330. 1. The committee may refuse to issue any
license required under this chapter for one or any
combination of causes stated in subsection 2 of this
section. The committee shall notify the applicant in
writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise the
applicant of the applicant's right to file a complaint with

SB 1541 5
the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter
621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission, as provided by
chapter 621, against any holder of any license required by
this chapter or any person who has failed to renew or has
surrendered the person's license for any one or any
combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in
chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage to an extent that such
use impairs a person's ability to perform the work of any
profession licensed or regulated by this chapter;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found
guilty, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, in a
criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the
United States, or of any country for any offense directly
related to the duties and responsibilities of the
occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of
whether or not sentence is imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or
bribery in securing any permit or license issued under this
chapter or in obtaining permission to take any examination
given or required under sections 337.300 to 337.345;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition, or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud,
misrepresentation, or dishonesty in the performance of the
functions or duties of any profession licensed by sections
337.300 to 337.345;

SB 1541 6
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person
to violate, any provision of sections 337.300 to 337.345, or
of any lawful rule adopted thereunder;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a certificate
of registration or authority, permit or license or allowing
any person to use his or her certificate of registration or
authority, permit, license, or diploma from any school;
(8) Disciplinary action against the holder of a
license or other right to practice any profession regulated
by sections 337.300 to 337.345 granted by another state,
territory, federal agency, or country upon grounds for which
revocation or suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) A person is finally adjudged insane or
incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or
offer to practice any profession licensed or regulated by
sections 337.300 to 337.345 who is not registered and
currently eligible to practice as provided in sections
337.300 to 337.345;
(11) Issuance of a certificate of registration or
authority, permit, or license based upon a material mistake
of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid certificate or license
if so required by sections 337.300 to 337.345 or any rule
promulgated thereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is
false, misleading, or deceptive to the general public or
persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is
primarily directed;

SB 1541 7
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in
the code of conduct as adopted by the committee and filed
with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For
purposes of this subdivision, the term "conversion therapy"
means any practices or treatments that seek to change an
individual's sexual orientation or gender identity,
including efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions
or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or
feelings toward individuals of the same gender. The term
"conversion therapy" shall not include counseling that
provides assistance to a person undergoing gender transition
or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and
understanding of a person or facilitates a person's coping,
social support, and identity exploration and development,
including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to
prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual
practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings
shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of
this section, for disciplinary action are met, the committee
may, singly or in combination, censure or place the person
named in the complaint on probation on such terms and
conditions as the department deems appropriate for a period
not to exceed five years, or may suspend, for a period not
to exceed three years, or revoke the license, certificate,
or permit.
337.525. 1. The committee may refuse to issue or
renew any license required by the provisions of sections

SB 1541 8
337.500 to 337.540 for one or any combination of causes
stated in subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall
notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the
refusal and shall advise the applicant of his or her right
to file a complaint with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission as provided by
chapter 621 against any holder of any license required by
sections 337.500 to 337.540 or any person who has failed to
renew or has surrendered his license for any one or any
combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in
chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage to an extent that such
use impairs a person's ability to engage in the occupation
of professional counselor;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found
guilty, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, in a
criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the
United States, or of any country, for any offense directly
related to the duties and responsibilities of the
occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of
whether or not sentence is imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or
bribery in securing any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of sections 337.500 to 337.540 or in obtaining
permission to take any examination given or required
pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.500 to 337.540;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation;

SB 1541 9
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, fraud, misrepresentation
or dishonesty in the performance of the functions or duties
of a professional counselor;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person
to violate, any provision of sections 337.500 to 337.540, or
of any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to
sections 337.500 to 337.540;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a license or
allowing any person to use his or her license or diploma
from any school;
(8) Revocation or suspension of a license or other
right to practice counseling granted by another state,
territory, federal agency or country upon grounds for which
revocation or suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) A person is finally adjudged incapacitated by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or
offer to practice professional counseling who is not
licensed and currently eligible to practice under the
provisions of sections 337.500 to 337.540;
(11) Issuance of a license based upon a material
mistake of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid license if so required
by sections 337.500 to 337.540 or any rule promulgated
hereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is
false, misleading or deceptive to the general public or
persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is
primarily directed;

SB 1541 10
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in
the ethical standards for counselors adopted by the division
and filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For
purposes of this subdivision, the term "conversion therapy"
means any practices or treatments that seek to change an
individual's sexual orientation or gender identity,
including efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions
or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or
feelings toward individuals of the same gender. The term
"conversion therapy" shall not include counseling that
provides assistance to a person undergoing gender transition
or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and
understanding of a person or facilitates a person's coping,
social support, and identity exploration and development,
including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to
prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual
practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. Any person, organization, association or
corporation who reports or provides information to the
committee pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and who
does so in good faith shall not be subject to an action for
civil damages as a result thereof.
4. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings
shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of
this section, for disciplinary action are met, the committee
may censure or place the person named in the complaint on
probation on such terms and conditions as the committee
deems appropriate for a period not to exceed five years, or

SB 1541 11
may suspend, for a period not to exceed three years, or
revoke the license.
337.630. 1. The committee may refuse to issue or
renew any license required by the provisions of sections
337.600 to 337.689 for one or any combination of causes
stated in subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall
notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the
refusal and shall advise the applicant of the applicant's
right to file a complaint with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission as provided by
chapter 621 against any holder of any license required by
sections 337.600 to 337.689 or any person who has failed to
renew or has surrendered the person's license for any one or
any combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in
chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage to an extent that such
use impairs a person's ability to engage in the occupation
of social work licensed under this chapter; except that the
fact that a person has undergone treatment for past
substance or alcohol abuse and/or has participated in a
recovery program, shall not by itself be cause for refusal
to issue or renew a license;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found
guilty, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, in a
criminal prosecution pursuant to the laws of any state, of
the United States, or of any country, for any offense
directly related to the duties and responsibilities of the
occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of
whether or not sentence is imposed;

SB 1541 12
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or
bribery in securing any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of sections 337.600 to 337.689 or in obtaining
permission to take any examination given or required
pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to 337.689;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, fraud, misrepresentation
or dishonesty in the performance of the functions or duties
of a social worker licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person
to violate, any provision of sections 337.600 to 337.689, or
of any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to
sections 337.600 to 337.689;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a license or
allowing any person to use the person's license or diploma
from any school;
(8) Revocation or suspension of a license or other
right to practice social work licensed pursuant to this
chapter granted by another state, territory, federal agency
or country upon grounds for which revocation or suspension
is authorized in this state;
(9) Final adjudication as incapacitated by a court of
competent jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or
offer to practice social work licensed pursuant to this
chapter who is not licensed and currently eligible to
practice pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to
337.689;
(11) Obtaining a license based upon a material mistake
of fact;

SB 1541 13
(12) Failure to display a valid license if so required
by sections 337.600 to 337.689 or any rule promulgated
hereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is
false, misleading or deceptive to the general public or
persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is
primarily directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in
the ethical standards for clinical social workers adopted by
the committee by rule and filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For
purposes of this subdivision, the term "conversion therapy"
means any practices or treatments that seek to change an
individual's sexual orientation or gender identity,
including efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions
or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or
feelings toward individuals of the same gender. The term
"conversion therapy" shall not include counseling that
provides assistance to a person undergoing gender transition
or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and
understanding of a person or facilitates a person's coping,
social support, and identity exploration and development,
including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to
prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual
practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. Any person, organization, association or
corporation who reports or provides information to the
committee pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to
337.689 and who does so in good faith shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages as a result thereof.

SB 1541 14
4. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings
shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of
this section, for disciplinary action are met, the committee
may censure or place the person named in the complaint on
100 probation on such terms and conditions as the committee
101 deems appropriate for a period not to exceed five years, or
102 may suspend, for a period not to exceed three years, or
103 revoke the license.
337.730. 1. The committee may refuse to issue or
renew any license required by the provisions of sections
337.700 to 337.739 for one or any combination of causes
stated in subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall
notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the
refusal and shall advise the applicant of the applicant's
right to file a complaint with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission as provided by
chapter 621 against any holder of any license required by
sections 337.700 to 337.739 or any person who has failed to
renew or has surrendered the person's license for any one or
any combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in
chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage to an extent that such
use impairs a person's ability to engage in the occupation
of marital and family therapist; except the fact that a
person has undergone treatment for past substance or alcohol
abuse or has participated in a recovery program, shall not
by itself be cause for refusal to issue or renew a license;

SB 1541 15
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found
guilty, or entered a plea of guilty in a criminal
prosecution under the laws of any state, of the United
States, or of any country, for any offense directly related
to the duties and responsibilities of the occupation, as set
forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not
sentence is imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or
bribery in securing any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of sections 337.700 to 337.739 or in obtaining
permission to take any examination given or required
pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.700 to 337.739;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, fraud, misrepresentation
or dishonesty in the performance of the functions or duties
of a marital and family therapist;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person
to violate, any provision of sections 337.700 to 337.739 or
of any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to
sections 337.700 to 337.739;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a license or
allowing any person to use the person's license or diploma
from any school;
(8) Revocation or suspension of a license or other
right to practice marital and family therapy granted by
another state, territory, federal agency or country upon
grounds for which revocation or suspension is authorized in
this state;
(9) Final adjudication as incapacitated by a court of
competent jurisdiction;

SB 1541 16
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or
offer to practice marital and family therapy who is not
licensed and is not currently eligible to practice under the
provisions of sections 337.700 to 337.739;
(11) Obtaining a license based upon a material mistake
of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid license if so required
by sections 337.700 to 337.739 or any rule promulgated
hereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is
false, misleading or deceptive to the general public or
persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is
primarily directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in
the ethical standards for marital and family therapists
adopted by the committee by rule and filed with the
secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For
purposes of this subdivision, the term "conversion therapy"
means any practices or treatments that seek to change an
individual's sexual orientation or gender identity,
including efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions
or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or
feelings toward individuals of the same gender. The term
"conversion therapy" shall not include counseling that
provides assistance to a person undergoing gender transition
or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and
understanding of a person or facilitates a person's coping,
social support, and identity exploration and development,
including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to
prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual

SB 1541 17
practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. Any person, organization, association or
corporation who reports or provides information to the
committee under sections 337.700 to 337.739 and who does so
in good faith shall not be subject to an action for civil
damages as a result thereof.
4. After filing of such complaint, the proceedings
shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds provided in subsection 2 of this
section for disciplinary action are met, the division may
censure or place the person named in the complaint on
probation on such terms and conditions as the committee
100 deems appropriate for a period not to exceed five years, or
101 may suspend for a period not to exceed three years, or
102 revoke the license.
✓